District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-215.10

Rules proposed by Commission.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-95, § 12a
as added Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-167, § 2(e), 29 DCR 4983
Aug. 1, 1985, D.C. Law 6-15, § 3(b), 32 DCR 3570
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 117(c), 47 DCR 520

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1150.1.

Editor's Notes

Proposed rules approved: Pursuant to Resolution 5-387, the “Minority Business Opportunity Commission Rules Approval Resolution of 1983”, effective October 18, 1983, the Council approved the proposed rules of the District of Columbia Minority Business Opportunity Commission transmitted by the Mayor on July 1, 1983.